Washington statutes.
RCW 6.32.220

Continuances.

A special proceeding under this chapter instituted before one judge may be continued from time to time before another judge of the same court with like effect as if it had been instituted or commenced before the judge who last heard the same.

[ 1893 c 133 s 22; RRS s 634.]